Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.110

Disposition of balance after judgment satisfied.

Where money is paid or property is delivered as prescribed in RCW 6.32.070, 6.32.080, 6.32.090, and 6.32.100 and afterwards the special proceeding is discontinued or dismissed, or the judgment is satisfied without resorting to the money or property, or a balance of the money or of the proceeds of the property, or a part of the property remains in the sheriff's or receiver's hands after satisfying the judgment and the costs and expenses of the special proceeding, the judge must make an order directing the sheriff or receiver to pay the money or deliver the property so remaining in his or her hands to the debtor, or to such other person as appears to be entitled thereto, upon payment of his or her fees and all other sums legally chargeable against the same.

[ 2011 c 336 s 156; 1893 c 133 s 11; RRS s 623.]